North Carolina, session 2025, HB124.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. Official State cookie.
The Moravian cookie is adopted as the official cookie of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H124-v-1*